Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20264-212
Attorney General; website; contents.

(1) In order to increase public transparency, the Attorney General shall provide information about agents of foreign principals registered in Nebraska on a portal of the Attorney General's website. The portal shall contain the information about each registrant and each registrant's activities within the State of Nebraska.

(2) The Attorney General may exchange data with government officials in other states and the federal government in order to increase the transparency and registration compliance of foreign principals from adversary nations or foreign terrorist organizations that operate in multiple states.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 12.